District of Columbia statutes.
7-702.01

Purpose and functions.

There is established a Long-Term Care Ombudsman Program for the District of Columbia within the Office on Aging. The program shall provide a comprehensive continuum of advocacy services for older persons and other persons who are residents in the District, which shall include:

(1)

Advocating for the rights of older persons and other persons who are residents;

(2)

Investigating and resolving any complaint made by or on behalf of an older person or other person who is a resident; and

(3)

Monitoring the quality of care, services provided, and quality of life experienced by older persons and residents to ensure that the care and services are in accordance with applicable District and federal laws.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-218, § 201, 36 DCR 534

History

This section is referenced in § 7-701.01.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 6-3511.

Prior Codifications